Illinois, session 104th, HB1831.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The Counties Code is amended by changing 5Section 5-1005 as follows: 6    (55 ILCS 5/5-1005)  (from Ch. 34, par. 5-1005)7    Sec. 5-1005. Powers. Each county shall have power:8        1. To purchase and hold the real and personal estate 9    necessary for the uses of the county, and to purchase and 10    hold, for the benefit of the county, real estate sold by 11    virtue of judicial proceedings in which the county is 12    plaintiff.13        2. To sell and convey or lease any real or personal 14    estate owned by the county.15        3. To make all contracts and do all other acts in 16    relation to the property and concerns of the county 17    necessary to the exercise of its corporate powers.18        4. To take all necessary measures and institute 19    proceedings to enforce all laws for the prevention of 20    cruelty to animals.21        5. To purchase and hold or lease real estate upon 22    which may be erected and maintained buildings to be 23    utilized for purposes of agricultural experiments and to   HB1831- 2 -LRB104 10736 RTM 20815 b1    purchase, hold and use personal property for the care and 2    maintenance of such real estate in connection with such 3    experimental purposes.4        6. To cause to be erected, or otherwise provided, 5    suitable buildings for, and maintain a county hospital and 6    necessary branch hospitals and/or a county sheltered care 7    home or county nursing home for the care of such sick, 8    chronically ill or infirm persons as may by law be proper 9    charges upon the county, or upon other governmental units, 10    and to provide for the management of the same. The county 11    board may establish rates to be paid by persons seeking 12    care and treatment in such hospital or home in accordance 13    with their financial ability to meet such charges, either 14    personally or through a hospital plan or hospital 15    insurance, and the rates to be paid by governmental units, 16    including the State, for the care of sick, chronically ill 17    or infirm persons admitted therein upon the request of 18    such governmental units. Any hospital maintained by a 19    county under this Section is authorized to provide any 20    service and enter into any contract or other arrangement 21    not prohibited for a hospital that is licensed under the 22    Hospital Licensing Act, incorporated under the General 23    Not-For-Profit Corporation Act, and exempt from taxation 24    under paragraph (3) of subsection (c) of Section 501 of 25    the Internal Revenue Code.26        7. To contribute such sums of money toward erecting,   HB1831- 3 -LRB104 10736 RTM 20815 b1    building, maintaining, and supporting any non-sectarian 2    public hospital located within its limits as the county 3    board of the county shall deem proper.4        8. To purchase and hold real estate for the 5    preservation of forests, prairies and other natural areas 6    and to maintain and regulate the use thereof.7        9. To purchase and hold real estate for the purpose of 8    preserving historical spots in the county, to restore, 9    maintain and regulate the use thereof and to donate any 10    historical spot to the State.11        10. To appropriate funds from the county treasury to 12    be used in any manner to be determined by the board for the 13    suppression, eradication and control of tuberculosis among 14    domestic cattle in such county.15        11. To take all necessary measures to prevent forest 16    fires and encourage the maintenance and planting of trees 17    and the preservation of forests.18        12. To authorize the closing on Saturday mornings of 19    all offices of all county officers at the county seat of 20    each county, and to otherwise regulate and fix the days 21    and the hours of opening and closing of such offices, 22    except when the days and the hours of opening and closing 23    of the office of any county officer are otherwise fixed by 24    law; but the power herein conferred shall not apply to the 25    office of State's Attorney and the offices of judges and 26    clerks of courts and, in counties of 500,000 or more   HB1831- 4 -LRB104 10736 RTM 20815 b1    population, the offices of county clerk.2        13. To provide for the conservation, preservation and 3    propagation of insectivorous birds through the expenditure 4    of funds provided for such purpose.5        14. To appropriate funds from the county treasury and 6    expend the same for care and treatment of tuberculosis 7    residents.8        15. In counties having less than 1,000,000 9    inhabitants, to take all necessary or proper steps for the 10    extermination of mosquitoes, flies or other insects within 11    the county.12        16. To install an adequate system of accounts and 13    financial records in the offices and divisions of the 14    county, suitable to the needs of the office and in 15    accordance with generally accepted principles of 16    accounting for governmental bodies, which system may 17    include such reports as the county board may determine.18        17. To purchase and hold real estate for the 19    construction and maintenance of motor vehicle parking 20    facilities for persons using county buildings, but the 21    purchase and use of such real estate shall not be for 22    revenue producing purposes.23        18. To acquire and hold title to real property located 24    within the county, or partly within and partly outside the 25    county by dedication, purchase, gift, legacy or lease, for 26    park and recreational purposes and to charge reasonable   HB1831- 5 -LRB104 10736 RTM 20815 b1    fees for the use of or admission to any such park or 2    recreational area and to provide police protection for 3    such park or recreational area. Personnel employed to 4    provide such police protection shall be conservators of 5    the peace within such park or recreational area and shall 6    have power to make arrests on view of the offense or upon 7    warrants for violation of any of the ordinances governing 8    such park or recreational area or for any breach of the 9    peace in the same manner as the police in municipalities 10    organized and existing under the general laws of the 11    State. All such real property outside the county shall be 12    contiguous to the county and within the boundaries of the 13    State of Illinois.14        19. To appropriate funds from the county treasury to 15    be used to provide supportive social services designed to 16    prevent the unnecessary institutionalization of elderly 17    residents, or, for operation of, and equipment for, senior 18    citizen centers providing social services to elderly 19    residents.20        20. To appropriate funds from the county treasury and 21    loan such funds to a county water commission created under 22    the "Water Commission Act", approved June 30, 1984, as now 23    or hereafter amended, in such amounts and upon such terms 24    as the county may determine or the county and the 25    commission may agree. The county shall not under any 26    circumstances be obligated to make such loans. The county   HB1831- 6 -LRB104 10736 RTM 20815 b1    shall not be required to charge interest on any such 2    loans.3        21. To appropriate and expend funds from the county 4    treasury for economic development purposes, including the 5    making of grants to any other governmental entity or 6    commercial enterprise deemed necessary or desirable for 7    the promotion of economic development in the county. 8        22. To lease space on a telecommunications tower to a 9    public or private entity. 10        23. In counties having a population of 100,000 or less 11    and a public building commission organized by the county 12    seat of the county, to cause to be erected or otherwise 13    provided, and to maintain or cause to be maintained, 14    suitable facilities to house students pursuing a 15    post-secondary education at an academic institution 16    located within the county. The county may provide for the 17    management of the facilities. 18        24. To declare what are nuisances, including, but not 19    limited to, sound amplification, construction noise, and 20    noise from off-road vehicles, and to take all necessary 21    measures to abate nuisances within the county's 22    jurisdiction. 23    All contracts for the purchase of coal under this Section 24shall be subject to the provisions of "An Act concerning the 25use of Illinois mined coal in certain plants and 26institutions", filed July 13, 1937, as amended.  HB1831- 7 -LRB104 10736 RTM 20815 b1(Source: P.A. 95-197, eff. 8-16-07; 95-813, eff. 1-1-09; 296-622, eff. 8-24-09.)